Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-208
Violation; penalty; permit; suspension or revocation; procedure.

Every broker, agent, or dealer mentioned in sections 69-201 to 69-210 who shall violate any of the provisions thereof, shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

In addition, any permit issued pursuant to section 69-202 may be revoked or suspended if the holder of such permit violates any provision of state law classified as a misdemeanor or felony. Before any permit may be revoked or suspended the holder shall be given notice of the date and time for a hearing before the governing body or delegated officer or agency which issued the permit to show cause why the permit should not be revoked or suspended. Such hearing shall be held within seven days of the date of the notice.

Laws 1899, c. 10, § 8, p. 66;

R.S.1913, § 543;

C.S.1922, § 435;

C.S.1929, § 69-208;

R.S.1943, § 69-208;

Laws 1981, LB 44, § 7.